Illinois, session 104th, HB2429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Section 85 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/85)7    Sec. 85. Contract requirements. 8    (a) No entity may establish, operate, conduct, or maintain 9an establishment in this State unless a written service 10delivery contract is executed between the establishment and 11each resident or resident's representative in accordance with 12Section 90 and unless the establishment operates in accordance 13with the terms of the contract. The resident or the resident's 14representative shall be given a complete copy of the contract 15and all supporting documents and attachments and any changes 16whenever changes are made. If the resident does not understand 17English and if translated documents are not available, the 18establishment must explain its policies to a responsible 19relative or friend or another individual who has agreed to 20communicate the information to the resident.21    (b) A service delivery contract shall not permit rate 22increases for a resident's room and board before the 23expiration of the residency period specified in the contract.   HB2429- 2 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1If there is a rate increase for a resident's room and board 2provided in a subsequent contract that is greater than the 3percentage increase in the consumer price index-u during the 4preceding residency period, the establishment must provide 5justification for the increase.6    For the purposes of this subsection, "consumer price 7index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 8Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 9measures the average change in prices of goods and services 10purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 11all items, 1982-84 = 100. 12(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.) 13    Section 15. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 14changing Section 2-202 as follows: 15    (210 ILCS 45/2-202)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4152-202)16    Sec. 2-202. (a) Before a person is admitted to a facility, 17or at the expiration of the period of previous contract, or 18when the source of payment for the resident's care changes 19from private to public funds or from public to private funds, a 20written contract shall be executed between a licensee and the 21following in order of priority: 22        (1) the person, or if the person is a minor, his parent 23    or guardian; or 24        (2) the person's guardian, if any, or agent, if any,   HB2429- 3 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1    as defined in Section 2-3 of the Illinois Power of 2    Attorney Act; or 3        (3) a member of the person's immediate family.4    An adult person shall be presumed to have the capacity to 5contract for admission to a long term care facility unless he 6has been adjudicated a "person with a disability" within the 7meaning of Section 11a-2 of the Probate Act of 1975, or unless 8a petition for such an adjudication is pending in a circuit 9court of Illinois.10    If there is no guardian, agent or member of the person's 11immediate family available, able or willing to execute the 12contract required by this Section and a physician determines 13that a person is so disabled as to be unable to consent to 14placement in a facility, or if a person has already been found 15to be a "person with a disability", but no order has been 16entered allowing residential placement of the person, that 17person may be admitted to a facility before the execution of a 18contract required by this Section; provided that a petition 19for guardianship or for modification of guardianship is filed 20within 15 days of the person's admission to a facility, and 21provided further that such a contract is executed within 10 22days of the disposition of the petition.23    No adult shall be admitted to a facility if he objects, 24orally or in writing, to such admission, except as otherwise 25provided in Chapters III and IV of the Mental Health and 26Developmental Disabilities Code or Section 11a-14.1 of the   HB2429- 4 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1Probate Act of 1975.2    If a person has not executed a contract as required by this 3Section, then such a contract shall be executed on or before 4July 1, 1981, or within 10 days after the disposition of a 5petition for guardianship or modification of guardianship that 6was filed prior to July 1, 1981, whichever is later.7    Before a licensee enters a contract under this Section, it 8shall provide the prospective resident and his or her 9guardian, if any, with written notice of the licensee's policy 10regarding discharge of a resident whose private funds for 11payment of care are exhausted.12    Before a licensee enters into a contract under this 13Section, it shall provide the resident or prospective resident 14and his or her guardian, if any, with a copy of the licensee's 15policy regarding the assignment of Social Security 16representative payee status as a condition of the contract 17when the resident's or prospective resident's care is being 18funded under Title XIX of the Social Security Act and Article V 19of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 20    (b) A resident shall not be discharged or transferred at 21the expiration of the term of a contract, except as provided in 22Sections 3-401 through 3-423.23    (c) At the time of the resident's admission to the 24facility, a copy of the contract shall be given to the 25resident, his guardian, if any, and any other person who 26executed the contract.  HB2429- 5 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1    (d) A copy of the contract for a resident who is supported 2by nonpublic funds other than the resident's own funds shall 3be made available to the person providing the funds for the 4resident's support.5    (e) The original or a copy of the contract shall be 6maintained in the facility and be made available upon request 7to representatives of the Department and the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services.9    (f) The contract shall be written in clear and unambiguous 10language and shall be printed in not less than 12-point type. 11The general form of the contract shall be prescribed by the 12Department.13    (g) The contract shall specify: 14        (1) the term of the contract; 15        (2) the services to be provided under the contract and 16    the charges for the services; 17        (3) the services that may be provided to supplement 18    the contract and the charges for the services; 19        (4) the sources liable for payments due under the 20    contract; 21        (5) the amount of deposit paid; and 22        (6) the rights, duties and obligations of the 23    resident, except that the specification of a resident's 24    rights may be furnished on a separate document which 25    complies with the requirements of Section 2-211.26    (h) The contract shall designate the name of the   HB2429- 6 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1resident's representative, if any. The resident shall provide 2the facility with a copy of the written agreement between the 3resident and the resident's representative which authorizes 4the resident's representative to inspect and copy the 5resident's records and authorizes the resident's 6representative to execute the contract on behalf of the 7resident required by this Section.8    (i) The contract shall provide that if the resident is 9compelled by a change in physical or mental health to leave the 10facility, the contract and all obligations under it shall 11terminate on 7 days notice. No prior notice of termination of 12the contract shall be required, however, in the case of a 13resident's death. The contract shall also provide that in all 14other situations, a resident may terminate the contract and 15all obligations under it with 30 days notice. All charges 16shall be prorated as of the date on which the contract 17terminates, and, if any payments have been made in advance, 18the excess shall be refunded to the resident. This provision 19shall not apply to life-care contracts through which a 20facility agrees to provide maintenance and care for a resident 21throughout the remainder of his life nor to continuing-care 22contracts through which a facility agrees to supplement all 23available forms of financial support in providing maintenance 24and care for a resident throughout the remainder of his life.25    (j) In addition to all other contract specifications 26contained in this Section admission contracts shall also   HB2429- 7 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1specify: 2        (1) whether the facility accepts Medicaid clients; 3        (2) whether the facility requires a deposit of the 4    resident or his family prior to the establishment of 5    Medicaid eligibility; 6        (3) in the event that a deposit is required, a clear 7    and concise statement of the procedure to be followed for 8    the return of such deposit to the resident or the 9    appropriate family member or guardian of the person; 10        (4) that all deposits made to a facility by a 11    resident, or on behalf of a resident, shall be returned by 12    the facility within 30 days of the establishment of 13    Medicaid eligibility, unless such deposits must be drawn 14    upon or encumbered in accordance with Medicaid eligibility 15    requirements established by the Department of Healthcare 16    and Family Services.17    (k) It shall be a business offense for a facility to 18knowingly and intentionally both retain a resident's deposit 19and accept Medicaid payments on behalf of that resident.20    (l) A contract under this Section shall not permit rate 21increases for a resident's room and board before the 22expiration of the residency period specified in the contract. 23If there is a rate increase for a resident's room and board 24provided in a subsequent contract that is greater than the 25percentage increase in the consumer price index-u during the 26preceding residency period, the facility must provide   HB2429- 8 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1justification for the increase.2    For the purposes of this subsection, "consumer price 3index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 4Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 5measures the average change in prices of goods and services 6purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 7all items, 1982-84 = 100. 8(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 9    Section 20. The MC/DD Act is amended by changing Section 102-202 as follows: 11    (210 ILCS 46/2-202)12    Sec. 2-202. Contract required. 13    (a) Before a person is admitted to a facility, or at the 14expiration of the period of previous contract, or when the 15source of payment for the resident's care changes from private 16to public funds or from public to private funds, a written 17contract shall be executed between a licensee and the 18following in order of priority:19        (1) the person, or if the person is a minor, his parent 20    or guardian; or21        (2) the person's guardian, if any, or agent, if any, 22    as defined in Section 2-3 of the Illinois Power of 23    Attorney Act; or24        (3) a member of the person's immediate family.   HB2429- 9 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1    An adult person shall be presumed to have the capacity to 2contract for admission to a facility unless he or she has been 3adjudicated a "disabled person" within the meaning of Section 411a-2 of the Probate Act of 1975, or unless a petition for such 5an adjudication is pending in a circuit court of Illinois. 6    If there is no guardian, agent or member of the person's 7immediate family available, able or willing to execute the 8contract required by this Section and a physician determines 9that a person is so disabled as to be unable to consent to 10placement in a facility, or if a person has already been found 11to be a "disabled person", but no order has been entered 12allowing residential placement of the person, that person may 13be admitted to a facility before the execution of a contract 14required by this Section; provided that a petition for 15guardianship or for modification of guardianship is filed 16within 15 days of the person's admission to a facility, and 17provided further that such a contract is executed within 10 18days of the disposition of the petition. 19    No adult shall be admitted to a facility if he or she 20objects, orally or in writing, to such admission, except as 21otherwise provided in Chapters III and IV of the Mental Health 22and Developmental Disabilities Code or Section 11a-14.1 of the 23Probate Act of 1975. 24    Before a licensee enters a contract under this Section, it 25shall provide the prospective resident and his or her 26guardian, if any, with written notice of the licensee's policy   HB2429- 10 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1regarding discharge of a resident whose private funds for 2payment of care are exhausted.3    (b) A resident shall not be discharged or transferred at 4the expiration of the term of a contract, except as provided in 5Sections 3-401 through 3-423.6    (c) At the time of the resident's admission to the 7facility, a copy of the contract shall be given to the 8resident, his or her guardian, if any, and any other person who 9executed the contract.10    (d) A copy of the contract for a resident who is supported 11by nonpublic funds other than the resident's own funds shall 12be made available to the person providing the funds for the 13resident's support.14    (e) The original or a copy of the contract shall be 15maintained in the facility and be made available upon request 16to representatives of the Department and the Department of 17Healthcare and Family Services.18    (f) The contract shall be written in clear and unambiguous 19language and shall be printed in not less than 12-point type. 20The general form of the contract shall be prescribed by the 21Department.22    (g) The contract shall specify:23        (1) the term of the contract;24        (2) the services to be provided under the contract and 25    the charges for the services;26        (3) the services that may be provided to supplement   HB2429- 11 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1    the contract and the charges for the services;2        (4) the sources liable for payments due under the 3    contract;4        (5) the amount of deposit paid; and5        (6) the rights, duties and obligations of the 6    resident, except that the specification of a resident's 7    rights may be furnished on a separate document which 8    complies with the requirements of Section 2-211.9    (h) The contract shall designate the name of the 10resident's representative, if any. The resident shall provide 11the facility with a copy of the written agreement between the 12resident and the resident's representative which authorizes 13the resident's representative to inspect and copy the 14resident's records and authorizes the resident's 15representative to execute the contract on behalf of the 16resident required by this Section.17    (i) The contract shall provide that if the resident is 18compelled by a change in physical or mental health to leave the 19facility, the contract and all obligations under it shall 20terminate on 7 days' notice. No prior notice of termination of 21the contract shall be required, however, in the case of a 22resident's death. The contract shall also provide that in all 23other situations, a resident may terminate the contract and 24all obligations under it with 30 days' notice. All charges 25shall be prorated as of the date on which the contract 26terminates, and, if any payments have been made in advance,   HB2429- 12 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1the excess shall be refunded to the resident. This provision 2shall not apply to life care contracts through which a 3facility agrees to provide maintenance and care for a resident 4throughout the remainder of his life nor to continuing care 5contracts through which a facility agrees to supplement all 6available forms of financial support in providing maintenance 7and care for a resident throughout the remainder of his or her 8life.9    (j) In addition to all other contract specifications 10contained in this Section admission contracts shall also 11specify:12        (1) whether the facility accepts Medicaid clients;13        (2) whether the facility requires a deposit of the 14    resident or his or her family prior to the establishment 15    of Medicaid eligibility;16        (3) in the event that a deposit is required, a clear 17    and concise statement of the procedure to be followed for 18    the return of such deposit to the resident or the 19    appropriate family member or guardian of the person; and20        (4) that all deposits made to a facility by a 21    resident, or on behalf of a resident, shall be returned by 22    the facility within 30 days of the establishment of 23    Medicaid eligibility, unless such deposits must be drawn 24    upon or encumbered in accordance with Medicaid eligibility 25    requirements established by the Department of Healthcare 26    and Family Services.  HB2429- 13 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1    (k) It shall be a business offense for a facility to 2knowingly and intentionally both retain a resident's deposit 3and accept Medicaid payments on behalf of that resident.4    (l) A contract under this Section shall not permit rate 5increases for a resident's room and board before the 6expiration of the residency period specified in the contract. 7If there is a rate increase for a resident's room and board 8provided in a subsequent contract that is greater than the 9percentage increase in the consumer price index-u during the 10preceding residency period, the facility must provide 11justification for the increase.12    For the purposes of this subsection, "consumer price 13index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 14Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 15measures the average change in prices of goods and services 16purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 17all items, 1982-84 = 100. 18(Source: P.A. 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.) 19    Section 25. The ID/DD Community Care Act is amended by 20changing Section 2-202 as follows: 21    (210 ILCS 47/2-202)22    Sec. 2-202. Contract required. 23    (a) Before a person is admitted to a facility, or at the 24expiration of the period of previous contract, or when the   HB2429- 14 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1source of payment for the resident's care changes from private 2to public funds or from public to private funds, a written 3contract shall be executed between a licensee and the 4following in order of priority:5        (1) the person, or if the person is a minor, his parent 6    or guardian; or7        (2) the person's guardian, if any, or agent, if any, 8    as defined in Section 2-3 of the Illinois Power of 9    Attorney Act; or10        (3) a member of the person's immediate family. 11    An adult person shall be presumed to have the capacity to 12contract for admission to a long term care facility unless he 13or she has been adjudicated a "person with a disability" 14within the meaning of Section 11a-2 of the Probate Act of 1975, 15or unless a petition for such an adjudication is pending in a 16circuit court of Illinois. 17    If there is no guardian, agent or member of the person's 18immediate family available, able or willing to execute the 19contract required by this Section and a physician determines 20that a person is so disabled as to be unable to consent to 21placement in a facility, or if a person has already been found 22to be a "person with a disability", but no order has been 23entered allowing residential placement of the person, that 24person may be admitted to a facility before the execution of a 25contract required by this Section; provided that a petition 26for guardianship or for modification of guardianship is filed   HB2429- 15 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1within 15 days of the person's admission to a facility, and 2provided further that such a contract is executed within 10 3days of the disposition of the petition. 4    No adult shall be admitted to a facility if he or she 5objects, orally or in writing, to such admission, except as 6otherwise provided in Chapters III and IV of the Mental Health 7and Developmental Disabilities Code or Section 11a-14.1 of the 8Probate Act of 1975. 9    Before a licensee enters a contract under this Section, it 10shall provide the prospective resident and his or her 11guardian, if any, with written notice of the licensee's policy 12regarding discharge of a resident whose private funds for 13payment of care are exhausted.14    (b) A resident shall not be discharged or transferred at 15the expiration of the term of a contract, except as provided in 16Sections 3-401 through 3-423.17    (c) At the time of the resident's admission to the 18facility, a copy of the contract shall be given to the 19resident, his or her guardian, if any, and any other person who 20executed the contract.21    (d) A copy of the contract for a resident who is supported 22by nonpublic funds other than the resident's own funds shall 23be made available to the person providing the funds for the 24resident's support.25    (e) The original or a copy of the contract shall be 26maintained in the facility and be made available upon request   HB2429- 16 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1to representatives of the Department and the Department of 2Healthcare and Family Services.3    (f) The contract shall be written in clear and unambiguous 4language and shall be printed in not less than 12-point type. 5The general form of the contract shall be prescribed by the 6Department.7    (g) The contract shall specify:8        (1) the term of the contract;9        (2) the services to be provided under the contract and 10    the charges for the services;11        (3) the services that may be provided to supplement 12    the contract and the charges for the services;13        (4) the sources liable for payments due under the 14    contract;15        (5) the amount of deposit paid; and16        (6) the rights, duties and obligations of the 17    resident, except that the specification of a resident's 18    rights may be furnished on a separate document which 19    complies with the requirements of Section 2-211.20    (h) The contract shall designate the name of the 21resident's representative, if any. The resident shall provide 22the facility with a copy of the written agreement between the 23resident and the resident's representative which authorizes 24the resident's representative to inspect and copy the 25resident's records and authorizes the resident's 26representative to execute the contract on behalf of the   HB2429- 17 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1resident required by this Section.2    (i) The contract shall provide that if the resident is 3compelled by a change in physical or mental health to leave the 4facility, the contract and all obligations under it shall 5terminate on 7 days' notice. No prior notice of termination of 6the contract shall be required, however, in the case of a 7resident's death. The contract shall also provide that in all 8other situations, a resident may terminate the contract and 9all obligations under it with 30 days' notice. All charges 10shall be prorated as of the date on which the contract 11terminates, and, if any payments have been made in advance, 12the excess shall be refunded to the resident. This provision 13shall not apply to life care contracts through which a 14facility agrees to provide maintenance and care for a resident 15throughout the remainder of his life nor to continuing care 16contracts through which a facility agrees to supplement all 17available forms of financial support in providing maintenance 18and care for a resident throughout the remainder of his or her 19life.20    (j) In addition to all other contract specifications 21contained in this Section admission contracts shall also 22specify:23        (1) whether the facility accepts Medicaid clients;24        (2) whether the facility requires a deposit of the 25    resident or his or her family prior to the establishment 26    of Medicaid eligibility;  HB2429- 18 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1        (3) in the event that a deposit is required, a clear 2    and concise statement of the procedure to be followed for 3    the return of such deposit to the resident or the 4    appropriate family member or guardian of the person;5        (4) that all deposits made to a facility by a 6    resident, or on behalf of a resident, shall be returned by 7    the facility within 30 days of the establishment of 8    Medicaid eligibility, unless such deposits must be drawn 9    upon or encumbered in accordance with Medicaid eligibility 10    requirements established by the Department of Healthcare 11    and Family Services.12    (k) It shall be a business offense for a facility to 13knowingly and intentionally both retain a resident's deposit 14and accept Medicaid payments on behalf of that resident.15    (l) A contract under this Section shall not permit rate 16increases for a resident's room and board before the 17expiration of the residency period specified in the contract. 18If there is a rate increase for a resident's room and board 19provided in a subsequent contract that is greater than the 20percentage increase in the consumer price index-u during the 21preceding residency period, the facility must provide 22justification for the increase.23    For the purposes of this subsection, "consumer price 24index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 25Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 26measures the average change in prices of goods and services   HB2429- 19 -LRB104 08265 BAB 18315 b1purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 2all items, 1982-84 = 100. 3(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)